Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB735.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 915 and 1003(b) and (f) of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, are amended to read:Section 915. Casting of Lots for Position of Names Upon the Primary Ballots or Ballot Labels; Notice to Candidates.--Immediately after the last day fixed for filing of such 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 nomination petitions with them, the Secretary of the Commonwealth or the county board, as the case may be, shall fix a day for the casting of lots, in such manner as may be prescribed by the Secretary of the Commonwealth, or county board, as the case may be, for the position of names upon the primary ballots or ballot labels. The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall give at least two (2) days notice by mail of said date to all candidates whose petitions have been received and filed in his office, and the county board shall give at least two (2) days notice of said date by posting thereof in a conspicuous place in its office, and by publication once in at least two newspapers of general circulation published in the county. All candidates may appear in person, or by agent duly authorized by letter of attorney, signed and acknowledged by an officer empowered to take acknowledgments. In the event of any of said candidates not being present in person or by representative at the time of casting of lots, it shall be the duty of the Secretary of the Commonwealth or the county board, as the case may be, to appoint some person to represent such absentee. After said lots are cast, the Secretary of the Commonwealth or the county board, as the case may be, shall accordingly establish the order in which the names of said candidates are to appear upon the primary ballots or ballot labels, and certify the same for placing upon the official primary ballots or ballot labels. For candidates to offices which are to be voted on by electors of more than one county, the Secretary of the Commonwealth shall create a list of such counties ordered by number of registered electors able to vote for the office, organized from most registered electors to least. Lots shall be drawn to determine the order in which the 20250HB0735PN0759 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 names of candidates are to appear upon the ballot in the county with the most registered electors able to vote for the office. For each successive county in the list, the order in which the names of candidates are to appear shall be rotated such that the name of the candidate listed first in the county with the greatest number of registered electors eligible to vote for the office shall appear last on the ballot in the county with the second-most registered electors eligible to vote for the office, and the name of the candidate listed second in the county with the greatest number of registered electors eligible to vote for the office shall appear first in the county with the second-most registered electors eligible to vote for the office. The same rotation of candidate names shall continue for each county in the ordered list.Section 1003. Form of Official Election Ballot.--* * *(b) On the back of each ballot shall be printed in prominent type the words "Official Ballot," followed by the designation of the election district for which it is prepared, the date of the election and the facsimile signatures of the members of the county board of elections. The names of candidates shall be arranged under the title of the office for which they are candidates, and shall be printed [thereunder in the order of the votes obtained by the parties or bodies at the last gubernatorial election, beginning with the party obtaining the highest number of votes: Provided, however, That in the case of parties or bodies not represented on the ballot at the last gubernatorial election, the names of the candidates of such parties shall be arranged alphabetically, according to the party name or political appellation] as provided under section 1003.1. 20250HB0735PN0759 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 In the case of offices for which two or more candidates are to be voted for, the candidates of each party shall be arranged together in the order of the number of votes obtained by them at the primary, beginning with the candidates obtaining the highest number of votes, and the candidates of each political body shall be arranged in the order in which their names were placed in their nomination paper. Under the title of such offices where more than one candidate is to be voted for, shall be printed "Vote for not more than ........" (the blank space to indicate the number of candidates to be voted for the particular office.) Opposite or under the name of each candidate shall be printed the name or appellation of the political party or political body nominating him, and at the right of such name or appellation there shall be a square of sufficient size for the convenient insertion of a cross (X) or check ( )✓ mark.* * *[(f) In order that each elector may have the opportunity of designating his choice for all the candidates nominated by one political party or political body, there shall be printed on the extreme left of the ballot, and separated from the rest of the ballot by a space of at least one-half inch, a list of the names of all the political parties or political bodies represented on such ballot which have nominated candidates to be voted for at such election. Such names shall be arranged in the order of the votes obtained at the last gubernatorial election by the candidate for Governor of the parties or bodies nominating, beginning with the party that received the highest number of votes cast. Following the names of such political parties and political bodies shall be the names of the parties and bodies not represented on the ballot at the last gubernatorial 20250HB0735PN0759 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 election, arranged alphabetically, according to the party name or appellation. A square of sufficient size for the convenient insertion of a cross mark shall be placed at the right of each party name or appellation.]* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1003.1. Order of Candidates on the Ballot.--(a) For elections to offices which are to be voted on by the electors of only one county, immediately after the list of candidates to be placed on the General Election ballot is finalized, the Secretary of the Commonwealth or the county board, as the case may be, shall fix a day for the casting of lots, in such manner as may be prescribed by the Secretary of the Commonwealth or county board, as the case may be, for the position of names upon the primary ballots or ballot labels. The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall give at least two days' notice by mail of said date to all candidates whose petitions have been received and filed in his office, and the county board shall give at least two days' notice of said date by posting thereof in a conspicuous place in its office, and by publication once in at least two newspapers of general circulation published in the county. All candidates may appear in person, or by agent duly authorized by letter of attorney, signed and acknowledged by an officer empowered to take acknowledgments. In the event of any of said candidates not being present in person or by representative at the time of casting of lots, it shall be the duty of the Secretary of the Commonwealth or the county board, as the case may be, to appoint some person to represent such absentee. After said lots are cast, the Secretary of the Commonwealth or the county board, as the case may be, shall 20250HB0735PN0759 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accordingly establish the order in which the names of said candidates are to appear upon the ballots or ballot labels, and certify the same for placing upon the official ballots or ballot labels.(b) For candidates to offices which are to be voted on by electors of more than one county, the Secretary of the Commonwealth shall create a list of such counties ordered by number of registered electors able to vote for the office, organized from most registered electors to least. Lots shall be drawn to determine the order in which the names of candidates are to appear upon the ballot in the county with the most registered electors able to vote for the office. For each successive county in the list, the order in which the names of candidates are to appear shall be rotated such that the name of the candidate listed first in the county with the greatest number of registered electors eligible to vote for the office shall appear last on the ballot in the county with the second-most registered electors eligible to vote for the office, and the name of the candidate listed second in the county with the greatest number of registered electors eligible to vote for the office shall appear first in the county with the second-most registered electors eligible to vote for the office. The same rotation of candidate names shall continue for each county in the ordered list.Section 3. Section 1110(i) of the act is amended to read:Section 1110. Form of Ballot Labels on Voting Machines.--* * *(i) In primary elections, the ballot labels, containing the names of candidates seeking nomination by a political party, shall be segregated on the face of the machine in adjacent rows 20250HB0735PN0759 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or columns by parties, the priority of such political parties on the ballot labels to be determined in the same manner as provided for determining priority on paper ballots in section [1003 (f)] 1003.1 herein.* * *Section 4. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1303-E. Ballot order randomization study.The board shall conduct a study regarding the feasibility of implementing a precinct rotation system for the order of listing candidates on the ballot in both primary and general elections and for each type of office. By no later than six months after the effective date of this section, the study shall be published on the Joint State Government Commission's publicly accessible Internet website and made available in electronic format to the Office of the Governor and members of the General Assembly. The report shall include any recommendations developed by the board for the implementation of such a precinct rotation system or of any similar alternative method of varying the order in which candidates are listed on ballots so as to reduce or eliminate any statistical advantages provided to a candidate on the basis of ballot order.Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0735PN0759 - 7 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122